California, session 20252026, AB861.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.  The Legislature finds and declares all of the following: (a) Public transportation is essential for many community college students to access education and other opportunities.(b) Eliminating transportation costs can improve equity and educational outcomes for students.(c) Enhancing security on public transit benefits riders and the broader community.(d) A student ambassador program can provide valuable workforce training and promote safer transit experiences.SEC. 2. It is the intent of the Legislature to do both of the following:(a) Grant access to the public transportation services provided by the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority (”LA (“LA Metro”) at no cost to community college students.(b) Establish a student ambassador program within the County of Los Angeles to support security and community engagement on LA Metro rail and bus lines that serve community colleges.SEC. 3.Article 10 (commencing with Section 76150) is added to Chapter 1 of Part 47 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read:10.LA METRO LOS ANGELES COMMUNITY COLLEGE GOPASS AND STUDENT AMBASSADOR PROGRAM76150.This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the LA Metro Los Angeles Community College GoPass and Student Ambassador Program Act.76151.The LA Metro Los Angeles Community College GoPass and Student Ambassador Programs are hereby established in the Los Angeles Community College District.76152.SEC. 3. Article 8 (commencing with Section 72702) is added to Chapter 6 of Part 45 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: Article 8. LA Metro Los Angeles Community College GoPass and Student Ambassador Program72702. For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(a)“Community college district” means the Los Angeles Community College District.(b)“GoPass” means a free transit pass provided to a student enrolled at a campus of the Los Angeles Community College District that grants the student access to the services provided by LA Metro at no cost.(a) “GoPass TAP card” means a transit pass provided for purposes of the GoPass program operated by the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority for providing free transit passes to community college students with participating community colleges in the Los Angeles region.(c)(b) “LA Metro” means the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority.76153.72703. (a) (1) To promote the use of public transportation by community college students, the community college district shall issue a student a GoPass if the student is Los Angeles Community College District shall annually enter into a memorandum of understanding with LA Metro for purposes of providing GoPass TAP cards to participating students enrolled at a campus of the community college district and the student opts in to receive a GoPass when enrolling. district.(b)A GoPass shall be distributed to the student at the campus of the community college district where the student is enrolled.(c)A GoPass provided pursuant to this section shall be valid for the academic term in which the student is enrolled.(2) A memorandum of understanding entered into pursuant to this subdivision shall provide the cost-sharing rate per student that the Los Angeles Community College District will pay LA Metro for providing GoPass TAP cards to students.(b) The Los Angeles Community College District, upon entering into a memorandum of understanding pursuant to subdivision (a), shall permit students to opt into receiving a GoPass TAP card upon registering for classes and shall distribute GoPass TAP cards to students who opt in through the registrar’s office at the campus where the student is enrolled.76154.72704. (a) (1) LA Metro, in partnership with the community college district, Los Angeles Community College District, shall establish a student ambassador program.(2) All students of the community college district Los Angeles Community College District who are in good academic standing may apply to be a student ambassador.(3) LA Metro shall select the students who become student ambassadors.(b) Students selected as student ambassadors by LA Metro shall assist LA Metro in providing all of the following services:(1) Maintaining safety and security within the LA Metro system.(2) Assisting passengers by providing information, including directions and connections.(3) Reporting maintenance, cleanliness, and safety issues to LA Metro.(4) Supporting public outreach initiatives to promote student use of LA Metro.(c) (1) Each campus of the community college district Los Angeles Community College District shall designate a coordinator to encourage students to apply to the student ambassador program.(2) LA Metro shall develop student ambassador program guidelines to ensure consistency and effectiveness.(d) LA Metro shall train all student ambassadors in transit operations, conflict resolution, and public engagement.(e) Students selected as student ambassadors shall be compensated by the community college district Los Angeles Community College District at a minimum rate of pay of twenty-five dollars ($25) per hour.76155.72705. (a) On or before ____, and annually thereafter, the community college district Los Angeles Community College District shall submit a report to the Department of Finance and the budget committees of the Assembly and Senate that includes all of the following information:(1) The number of students receiving a GoPass TAP card during the previous year.(2) The average annual ridership per campus of the community college district.(3) The number of students participating in the student ambassador program.(4) The outcomes of the student ambassador program, including participant feedback and safety metrics.(5) Recommendations for improving the GoPass and student ambassador programs.(b)(1)(b) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (a) is inoperative on ____, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 4. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of existing programs within the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority to facilitate Los Angeles Community College District’s involvement.SEC. 5. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 6.(a)The sum of two million, five hundred thousand dollars ($ 2,500,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund for purposes of Article 10 (commencing with Section 76150) of Chapter 1 of Part 47 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code.(b)(1)Of the amount appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a), one million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be allocated to the Los Angeles Community College District for purposes of Section 76153 of the Education Code.(2)Of the amount appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a), one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) shall be allocated to the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority for purposes of Section 76154 of the Education Code.(c)For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations made pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.